District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-108.04

Partner’s power to bind partnership after dissolution.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 804, 44 DCR 777
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(x), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 41-158.4.